California statutes. Education Code
(3) Any building area, not to exceed the area that is equivalent to one classroom per schoolsite, used to provide support services pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 8800) of Part 6 or to provide integrated children’s services pursuant to Section 18986.40 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. A school shall meet the definition of a “qualifying school” under paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 8802 to qualify for this exemption from the area of adequate school construction.

(4) Any classroom acquired or constructed and continuously used by the school district primarily for the purpose of reducing class size in kindergarten or in any of grades 1 to 3, inclusive, pursuant to the school district’s participation in the Class Size Reduction Program contained in Chapter 6.10 (commencing with Section 52120) of Part 28.

(5) Any classroom acquired or constructed for the purpose of operating a community day school pursuant to Section 48660, if the classroom is not located on a regular elementary, middle, junior high, or senior high school site.

(c) The board may make exceptions to this section, or to the rules adopted pursuant thereto, if it determines that the exception or exceptions will be for the benefit of pupils affected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 893, Sec. 86.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17042.5.

(a) For purposes of determining the area of adequate school construction existing in an applicant school district pursuant to Section 17042.7, all portable classrooms, whether owned or leased, shall be included, except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive.

(1) Leased portable classrooms acquired by a school district shall not be included in the area of existing adequate school construction until January 1, 1991.

(2) Portable classrooms leased pursuant to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 17085) shall be excluded from the area of adequate school construction. Portable classrooms obtained by an applicant district pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 17088.5 also shall be excluded from the area of adequate school construction, except as to any portable classroom or classrooms for which the district rejected the board’s offer to purchase pursuant to that subdivision.

(3) Portable classrooms that have been leased or owned by the district for 20 years or more shall be excluded from the area of adequate school construction.

(4) Leased portable classrooms shall not be included in the area of adequate school construction for a period of five years from the date first leased by the district. That exclusion shall be extended by the board
 for one additional five-year period where the board finds that the continued use of the leased portable classrooms for classroom purposes is justified by additional growth in average daily attendance pursuant to the standards established by this part. If the board finds continued use to be no longer justified, it may extend the exclusion for a period of up to two years as necessary to maintain the eligibility of the applicant district for project funding pursuant to this chapter if the board finds that the district has made a good faith effort to obtain that funding in a timely manner. The additional five-year exclusion shall not apply to any portable classroom for which, under the lease agreement, the district is to take title, or the total consideration paid by the district for the lease and an option to purchase is determined by the board to be substantially equivalent to the cost of acquiring title.

(b) For purposes of this section,
 “portable classroom” means a classroom building of modular design and construction that meets all of the following criteria:

(1) Is designed and constructed to be relocatable and transportable over public streets.

(2) Is designed and constructed for relocation without the separation of the roof or floor from the building.

(3) When measured at the most exterior walls, has a floor area not in excess of 2,000 square feet.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17042.7.

(a) For any project application filed or amended on or after January 1, 1993, the area of adequate school construction existing in the applicant school district or, where appropriate, in the attendance area, at the time of application shall be calculated pursuant to the following formula:

(1) Identify by grade level all teaching stations existing in the school district or, where appropriate, the attendance area, as of January 1, 1993. For the purposes of this section, “teaching
 station” means any space that was constructed or reconstructed to serve as an area in which to provide pupil instruction.

(2) Determine the maximum pupil loading figure for each grade level pursuant to the district pupil loading standards in effect on January 1, 1993. For the purposes of this section, the “district pupil loading standards” are those pupil loading standards in effect in a school district on July 1, 1992, as a result of actions including, but not necessarily limited to, the execution of a collective bargaining agreement or the adoption of a district policy by the governing board of the school district. In no event may this figure be more than the maximum pupil loading standards established by the board, or less than three pupil units lower than those maximum pupil loading standards.

(3) Multiply the figure determined under paragraph (2) for each grade level by the
 number of teaching stations for the particular grade level, as determined under paragraph (1).

(4) Multiply the product determined under paragraph (3) by the maximum area allowance established for that grade level under this article.

(5) The sum of these computations for each grade level, as determined under paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, shall be the total area of adequate school construction existing in the district or attendance area pursuant to this formula.

(b) For purposes of this section, a school district that is participating in a class size reduction program set forth in this code, other than the Class Size Reduction Program (Ch. 6.10 (commencing with Section 52120) of Part 28), shall use the pupil loading standard established pursuant to that program.

(c) The area of existing adequate school construction calculated under this section shall not include, in any school operated on a year-round schedule, any teaching station that has been in continuous use during the preceding five-year period primarily for the operation of a preschool program or programs.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 893, Sec. 88.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17042.9.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a school district that complies with the requirements of subdivision (b) may replace a portable classroom, as defined in Section 17742.5, that has been leased or owned by the district for 20 years or more, with a permanent building if the resulting area of new building construction is no greater than the area that would be authorized under this chapter for the lease or purchase of a portable classroom.

(b) A school district that
 utilizes subdivision (a) shall fund its expenses incurred thereby through the issuance of general obligation bonds by the district or by the issuance of bonds pursuant to the Mello-Roos Community Facilities Act of 1982 (Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 53311) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code) or by any other financing mechanism that does not encumber the school district’s general fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 893, Sec. 89.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17043.

(a) There shall be allowed to each district with attendance units of 300 or more in kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, a maximum area of 55 square feet for each attendance unit of the district in kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive.

(b) The maximum total building area per attendance unit allowed to applicant districts with attendance units of less than 300 in kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, for such attendance units shall be determined by the board, and
 shall be building area to provide comparable facilities to those provided by subdivision (a) of this section, and shall be the least building area required to house adequately the estimated average daily attendance and the normal instructional and other services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17044.

There shall be allowed to each district a maximum area of 75 square feet for each attendance unit of the district in grades 7 and 8.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17045.

The maximum area allowed to a district for attendance units in junior high schools composed of grades 7 to 9, inclusive, or 7 to 10, inclusive, as the case may be, shall be determined pursuant to this section, rather than Sections 17044 and 17046. This section shall not apply to junior high schools composed of grades 7 and 8 only.

The maximum area allowed for attendance units in junior high schools shall be determined by computing, in accordance with this section, the number of square feet for the attendance units at each
 junior high school attendance center of the district, and totaling the number of square feet so determined for all attendance units in all such junior high school attendance centers of the district. There shall be allowed a maximum area of 75 square feet for each attendance unit of the junior high school attendance center in grades 7 and 8. For each attendance unit in grade 9, or grades 9 and 10, as the case may be, at each junior high school attendance center, there shall be allowed a maximum area equal to the number of square feet which would be allowed under Section 17046 for each attendance unit of an attendance center having a total number of attendance units equal to the total number of attendance units in grades 7 to 9, inclusive, or 7 to 10, inclusive, as the case may be, at such junior high school attendance center. The number of square feet which would be allowed under Section 17046 for each attendance unit of an attendance center shall be computed by determining in accordance with that section the
 total number of square feet which would be allowed at an attendance center and dividing such total number of square feet by the total number of attendance units at such attendance center.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17046.

There shall be allowed to each district a maximum area for the attendance units of the district in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, determined by computing, for the attendance units in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, at each attendance center of the district, a number of square feet for the number of attendance units in such grades at each attendance center, in accordance with the following table, and totaling the number of square feet so determined for all attendance units in such grades of all attendance centers of the district:Attendance units of 
attendance centerMaximum number of square feet of 
building area 1-50 18,000 51-100 18,000 plus 162 for each attendance unit over 50101-200 26,100 plus 99 for each attendance unit over 100201-300 36,000 plus 60 for each attendance unit over 200301-600 42,000 plus 54 for each attendance unit over 300601-1,800 58,200 plus 80 for each attendance unit over 600Over 1,800 154,200 plus 85 for each attendance unit over 1,800

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17046.7.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the determination of the area of allowable new building construction for any project for an applicant school district for which original construction commenced on or after January 1, 1987, shall be made on the basis of 107 percent of the area that would otherwise be determined for that purpose under this chapter, calculated to the nearest whole number.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17046.8.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the maximum allowable building area for each applicant district shall be reduced by the product of the maximum area per attendance unit calculated for each appropriate grade level and the number of pupils reported by the Superintendent of Public Instruction for that grade level pursuant to Section 42268. This reduction shall be calculated on the basis, at the district’s option, of either the district as a whole or the appropriate attendance area, as defined in Section 17041.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17047.

(a) The allowable new building area for the purpose of providing special day class and Resource Specialist Program facilities for special education pupils shall be negotiated and approved by the board, with any necessary assistance to be provided by the Special Education Division of the State Department of Education. The square footage allowances shall be computed within the maximum square footage set forth in the following schedule:Special Day Class
Basic NeedGrade
LevelsLoad­ing*Square
FootageNonsevere Disability—Specific Learning
Disability All121080—Mildly Intellectually
Disabled All121080—Severe Disorder
of Language All101080Severe Disability—Deaf and Hard of
Hearing All101080—Visually Impaired All101330 (1080 + 250 storage)—Orthopedically and
Other Health Im-paired All122000 (1080 + 400 toilets + 250 storage + 270 daily living skills + 3000 therapy + 750 therapy per additional classroom)—Autistic All61160 (1080 + 80 toilets)—Severely Emotion-
ally Disturbed All61160 (1080 + 80 toilets)—Severely Intellectually Disabled Elem.121750 (1080 + 400 toilets + 270 daily living skills) Secon.2150 (1080 + 400 toilets + 270 daily living skills + 400 vocational)—DevelopmentallyDisabled All102000 (1080 + 400 toilets + 250 storage + 270 daily living skills + 3000 therapy** + 750 therapy per additional CR)—Deaf-Blind/Multi All51400 (1080 + 200 storage + 150 toilets)PupilsSquare
FeetResource Specialist Program for those pupils with disabling conditions whose needs have been identified by the Individualized Education Program (IEP) Team, who require special education for a portion of the day, and who are assigned to a regular classroom for a majority of the schoolday.***All Maximum caseload for RS is 28, not all served at same time.1–82409–2848029–3772038–5696057–65120066–85144086–94168095–1121920 *Special pupils may usually be grouped without accordance to type, especially in smaller districts or where attendance zones may indicate, to maximize loadings per classroom where there are children with similar educational needs (Sec. 56364 or 56364.2, as applicable). **Therapy add-ons not to be provided if on same site as orthopedically impaired. ***To a maximum of 4 percent of the unhoused average daily attendance of the district, per new school or addition, to a maximum of 1920 square feet.(b) The allowable new building area shall be computed by dividing the number of eligible pupils by the minimum required loading per classroom for special day classes for the type of pupils to be enrolled. No new or additional facility shall be provided for special day classes unless the number of additional eligible pupils equals one-third or more of the minimum required loading.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 327, Sec. 2.   (AB 1599)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

17047.5.

(a) All school facilities purchased or newly constructed pursuant to this chapter for use, in whole or in part, by pupils who are individuals with exceptional needs, as defined in Section 56026, shall be designed and located on the schoolsite so as to maximize interaction between those individuals with exceptional needs and other pupils as appropriate to the needs of both.

(b) School district governing boards and county offices of education shall ensure that school facilities for
 pupils who are individuals with exceptional needs are integrated with other school facilities in applying for the purchase or new construction of school facilities pursuant to this chapter.

(c) The State Allocation Board, after consultation with the State Department of Education and representatives from county offices of education, special education services regions, and school districts, shall develop and adopt any regulations necessary to implement this section.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, the requirement set forth in subdivision (a) may be waived, by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, only upon compliance with the following procedure:

(1) The applicant school district or county superintendent of schools shall file a written request for waiver that documents the reasons for its inability to comply
 with the requirement.

(2) The State Department of Education shall verify the reasons set forth pursuant to paragraph (1), including the documentation submitted, which verification shall be completed no later than 30 days after the filing of the request for waiver with the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(3) The Advisory Commission on Special Education, as established under Section 33590, at its first scheduled meeting following the verification conducted pursuant to paragraph (2), shall review the request for waiver, accompanying documentation, and the verification findings of the State Department of Education. No later than 15 days following the date of that meeting, the commission shall submit its written comments and recommendations regarding the request for waiver to the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(4) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall review the comments and recommendations submitted by the Advisory Commission on Special Education prior to approving or rejecting the request for waiver.

(5) Any request for waiver, submitted in accordance with this section, that is not rejected within 60 days of its receipt by the State Department of Education, shall be deemed approved.

(e) This section does not apply to any application for project funding under this chapter that meets one of the following conditions:

(1) The application was submitted to the board prior to January 1, 1987, and all of the facilities under the project for use, in whole or in part, by pupils who are individuals with exceptional needs are located on a schoolsite on which facilities for use by other pupils are also
 located.

(2) The application is for any other project, for which, prior to January 1, 1987, the board approved the drawing of final plans and the preparation of final specifications.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17047.6.

The board, with the advice of the Superintendent of Public Instruction, may determine the eligibility of county superintendents of schools to lease portable classrooms provided that a county superintendent of schools is eligible to receive one portable classroom pursuant to this section and Section 17717.2 for each 15 units of average daily attendance at county community schools in excess of the amount of average daily attendance claimed by the county superintendent of schools in the prior fiscal year except that, for pupils who are enrolled in a county community
 school and on independent study, only time spent in the classroom shall be included in the calculation of average daily attendance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 893, Sec. 90.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17048.

Whenever an existing building is to be reconstructed, rather than replaced, under an application pursuant to this chapter, there shall be allowed, for those attendance units to be housed in such reconstructed building, an additional five square feet of building area beyond the amounts set forth in Section 17043, 17044, 17045, or 17046.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17049.

(a) The board shall require, as a condition of providing funding for any project under this chapter, that, for any facilities for kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, or for any facilities for special education or continuation high school purposes, at least 30 percent of allowable new building construction for classrooms under the project be utilized for relocatable structures.

(b) The board may reduce the percentage requirement set forth in subdivision (a), as to any
 applicant, in the event that the quantity of relocatable structures necessary to comply with those requirements is unavailable from the manufacturers of those structures.

(c) The board may reduce or eliminate the percentage requirements set forth in subdivision (a), as to any applicant, under either of the following circumstances:

(1) Where the board finds that special conditions of terrain, climate, or unavailability of space within the attendance area make the use of relocatable structures impractical or inappropriate.

(2) Under the condition that, as the result of a future project for which the district receives funding under this chapter, located on the same schoolsite on which the current project is located, at least 30 percent of total building construction for classrooms on that schoolsite will be utilized for
 relocatable structures.

(d) Relocatable structures acquired by an applicant school district up to two years preceding the final approval by the board of the project application submitted by the district shall apply to the percentage requirements set forth in subdivision (a).

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (d), relocatable structures acquired by an applicant school district up to 10 years preceding the final approval by the board of the project application submitted by the district shall apply to the percentage requirements set forth in subdivision (a) if the relocatable structures are to be situated on the site of a new school to be constructed under the project and all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The relocatable structures were not previously used to satisfy the 30 percent requirement set forth in
 subdivision (a) under any other project constructed pursuant to this chapter.

(2) The board determines that the relocatable structures are in satisfactory condition upon being moved to the new schoolsite, and are usable for classroom purposes without requiring major repair or renovation for a period of not less than 20 years subsequent to that relocation.

(3) Subsequent to moving the relocatable structures to the new schoolsite, at least 30 percent of the classroom space at the schoolsite where the structures were previously located consists of relocatable structures.

The cost of moving the relocatable structures to the new schoolsite shall be at the school district’s sole expense.

(f) Whenever at least 10 percent of the allowable new building construction contained in an
 application is to be utilized for relocatable structures, an additional three square feet of building area for each pupil to be housed under the approved project shall be allowed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17050.

(a) A district may enter into a contract with the county, or other appropriate entity having responsibility for the provision of public library services, in which the district is located for the purpose of operating a joint-use library facility at a schoolsite owned by the district.

(b) The district may apply for the lease-purchase of a project which includes a library facility, pursuant to Section 17017, which facility, if constructed, would be of sufficient size to accommodate
 the requirements of a joint-use library for which the district has entered into a contract, pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) Should the board receive an application for a project which includes space for a joint-use library, the board shall evaluate the application disregarding any space in the proposed library facility which is beyond the needs of the district, provided the application contains a copy of the contract specified in subdivision (a), and provided that the contract contains at least the following:

(1) Agreement that the county or other appropriate entity shall deposit in the county school lease-purchase fund, created pursuant to Section 17034, an amount equal to the total cost of any space in the proposed library facility which is beyond the needs of the district, prior to the signing of the construction contract for the project. The deposit shall not be refundable,
 except to the extent that it may prove subsequently to be in excess of the actual total cost of the space which is beyond the needs of the district.

(2) Agreement between the district and the county or other appropriate entity regarding staffing, maintenance, materials acquisition, and other matters related to the administration and operating costs of the joint-use facility.

(3) Agreement between the district and the county or other appropriate entity regarding the procedure for amendment or termination of the contract, including the disposition of materials housed in the joint-use facility should termination of the contract occur.

(d) Any space in a joint-use library which is beyond the needs of the district shall not be included by the board in any calculations made for any other purposes provided for in this
 article for the period of time that the contract for that joint-use facility remains in effect. Should the contract be terminated, the board shall include the additional space in any calculations made after the termination for any other purposes provided for in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17051.

(a) A district may enter into an agreement with another governmental entity that includes some or all of the territory of the district for the purpose of the joint use of park and recreation facilities, including an auditorium, or commercial or industrial facilities.

(b) If the board receives an application for a project that includes some or all of the territory of the district for the purpose of the joint use of park and recreation facilities or commercial or industrial
 facilities, the board shall evaluate the application disregarding any space in the proposed joint-use facility that is beyond the needs of the district if the application contains a copy of the agreement specified in subdivision (a) and if the contract contains at least the following:

(1) An agreement that the county or other appropriate entity shall deposit in the county school lease-purchase fund, created pursuant to Section 17034, an amount equal to the total cost of any space in the proposed joint-use facility that is beyond the needs of the district, prior to the signing of the construction contract for the project. The deposit shall not be refundable, except to the extent that it may prove subsequently to be in excess of the actual total cost of the space that is beyond the needs of the district.

(2) An agreement between the district and the county or other appropriate
 entity regarding staffing, maintenance, materials acquisition, and other matters related to the administration and operating costs of the joint-use facility.

(3) An agreement between the district and the county or other appropriate entity regarding the procedure for amendment or termination of the contract, including the disposition of materials housed in the joint-use facility should termination of the contract occur.

(c) Any space in a joint-use facility that is beyond the needs of the district shall not be included by the board in any calculations made for any other purposes provided for in this article for the period of time that the contract for that joint-use facility remains in effect. If the contract is terminated, the board shall include the additional space in any calculations made after the termination for any other purposes provided for in this
 article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17052.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the State Allocation Board may fund joint-use projects to construct libraries, multipurpose rooms, and gymnasiums, on school campuses where these facilities are used jointly for both school and community purposes.

(b) A school district may apply to the State Allocation Board for funding under this section if it meets all of the following requirements:

(1) The school does
 not have the type of facility for which it seeks funding.

(2) The school district agrees to provide local matching funds for 50 percent of the eligible cost of the facility as set forth in subdivision (c), and 100 percent local or joint-use funding for all costs that exceed that standard, as required by subdivision (d).

(3) The school district has obtained approval of the plans for the facility from the Division of the State Architect and the State Department of Education.

(4) The school district has entered into a joint-use agreement with its joint-use partner that specifies the method for sharing capital and operating costs, specifies relative responsibilities for the operation and staffing of the facility, and specifies the manner in which the safety of school pupils will be maintained during school hours.

(5) The school district demonstrates that the facility will be used to the maximum extent possible for school and community purposes after regular school hours.

(c) The State Allocation Board shall establish standards for the amount of funding to be made available for each project under this section. The funding standards may be expressed as per-square-foot cost limits or per-pupil cost limits or both.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, project costs may exceed the board’s standards set forth in subdivision (c) if the excess is paid completely by local or joint-use partnership sources.

(e) On July 1 of each year the board shall apportion to qualifying applicant school districts those funds that it determines are available for the
 purposes of this section.

(f) The board may establish priority standards to govern the order of funding projects. If applications exceed available funding, the board shall give priority to applications where the size of the project is increased by at least 30 percent beyond minimum essential facilities through the use of additional funding from a joint-use partner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 753, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Space-Saver Schools [17055. - 17058.]

17055.

(a) The board shall authorize project funding under this chapter for the construction, in urban areas in which the construction of schools would ordinarily require the removal of residential, commercial, or industrial structures, of four elementary or junior high schools, or any combination thereof, none of which serve any of the grades 10 to 12, inclusive.

(b) The construction funded pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be designed to minimize the need for the relocation of inhabitants of residential, commercial, or industrial structures. The design features of the schools may include, but should not be limited to, the use of below-ground facility construction, multistory construction, multiuse construction where single-use construction currently exists, the joint use of facilities that otherwise involve such uses as a shopping center, office complex, or apartment building, the joint or dual use of land that otherwise involves park or other uses, overhead or underground parking, or the use of areas above or below streets or freeways.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17056.

Any school district that is a project applicant under this chapter may apply for the funding of a school specifically under this article, pursuant to which it may be approved by the board for funding only to the extent of its project eligibility under this chapter. The governing board of each district for which that funding is approved by the board shall do all of the following, in the order specified:

(a) Identify an area within the district that it determines to be appropriate for the construction of a school that meets the purposes of this article.

(b) Establish criteria for the purpose of identifying the school design that will most effectively accomplish the purposes of this article and the needs of the district. The district shall thereupon issue, in a manner approved by the board, a request for architectural design proposals incorporating those criteria.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17058.

The cost of any project funded under this article shall not exceed the maximum cost that would otherwise be allowable for a project funded under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.1. Alternative Use of Apportionments [17059. - 17059.2.]

17059.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(a) In many areas of the state, overcrowding in the schools has created a need for new school facilities in neighborhoods where little or no vacant land exists. School districts are compelled, therefore, to acquire property that already has been developed with structures, then demolish these structures and construct classroom space.

(b) With an estimated statewide need for school facilities within the next five years that exceeds fourteen billion dollars ($14,000,000,000), neither state nor local funds reasonably can be anticipated to meet this need.

(c) In many of the areas having overcrowded schools, a significant supply exists of vacant space in structures meeting current building codes.

(d) Use of this vacant space by schools can be a cost-effective means of providing classroom space for the students of California.

(e) This chapter and Section 4-306 of Part 1 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations authorize the reconstruction of existing commercial buildings for school facility purposes.

(f) No existing commercial building shall be considered for reconstruction for school facility classroom purposes unless it was designed and constructed according to the standards established in the 1976 Uniform Building Code or subsequent editions of that code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17059.1.

In a manner that is consistent with this chapter and the California Code of Regulations, a school district that is eligible for an apportionment for project funding for new construction under this chapter may use that apportionment for the acquisition and conversion of an existing commercial building to school facility purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17059.2.

The State Allocation Board in conjunction with the office of the State Architect shall advise all school districts in the state of the existence of the procedure for reconstructing existing commercial buildings for school facility purposes and shall upon request assist in the interpretation and successful implementation of the pertinent regulations in the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Joint Venture School Facilities Construction Projects [17060. - 17066.]

17060.

(a) A school district may enter into a joint venture relationship for the purposes of school facilities construction. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a school district entering into a joint venture relationship does so as an independent entity and not as an agent of the State Allocation Board.

(b) For the purposes of this article, “joint venture” means a collaborative undertaking by two or more persons or organizations for a specific project or projects, having the legal characteristics of a partnership.

(c) The joint venture relationship may, but is not required to, include any of the following:

(1) Joint use of the property of, or facilities on, the project site.

(2) Ground leases, alternative financing arrangements, or similar financing arrangements.

(3) A construction arrangement in which a school district enters into an agreement with a developer pursuant to which the school district initially stipulates the basic performance and programmatic criteria for the facility and the developer provides input into the design work and building construction services by entering into a contract with a single source team to administer the project in a manner consistent with state law, and construct the project to, under most circumstances, a maximum price.

(d) The price for the portion of the project that is funded by the state shall be established through a bidding process as approved by the State Allocation Board. All subcontract trade groups that are included within the project, shall be determined based upon competitive bidding for each contract group. All subcontracts shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder.

(e) The proposed uses of any facilities constructed under the joint venture project shall not be inconsistent with educational purposes and activities.

(f) The cost of any project funded under this article shall not exceed the maximum cost that would otherwise be allowable for a project funded under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17061.

(a) A school district may apply to the State Allocation Board for funding for the costs of property acquisition and the cost of construction, as specified in this chapter, of the school facilities portion of a joint venture project. The school district shall publicly solicit proposals for the joint venture project pursuant to the procedures set forth in this section and Sections 17062, 17521, 17522, and 17523.
